Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Administration and Enforcement

§ 77-9-481.
Duties of railroad inspectors.

The inspectors, employed pursuant to the authority granted in Section 65-1-173, shall be responsible for enforcing and investigating all violations of the railroad laws, and the rules, regulations and general orders of the Mississippi Transportation Commission promulgated thereunder. In the performance of their duties such employees shall give particular attention to the enforcement of the commission’s safety rules and regulations; blocking of rights-of-way; the inspection of all equipment, rights-of-way, roadbed and tracks; and the requirement respecting certificate of public convenience and necessity, permits or other laws affecting the operation of the railroad.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7806-03; Laws, 1970, ch. 429, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 69; Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 77-9-483.
Training of railroad inspectors.

After selection the inspectors shall go through thirty (30) days of intensive instruction of the laws of this state pertaining to the State Tax Commission, the Department of Public Safety, and the State Mississippi Department of Transportation, together with rules and regulations of all of these departments and the laws of this state pertaining to arrests.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7806-03; Laws, 1970, ch. 429, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 12; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 70, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-9-485.
Authority of railroad inspectors.

All inspectors on duty shall wear uniforms as prescribed by the Mississippi Transportation Commission, shall have the right to bear arms, and shall have authority to make arrests, and to stop and hold any train and the contents thereof which is being operated in violation of the railroad laws or the commission’s rules, regulations or general orders promulgated thereunder. No train shall be stopped except by order of the commission or by any member thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7806-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 429, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 71, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-9-487.
Purchase of necessary equipment authorized.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to purchase all necessary equipment to enforce the provisions of the railroad laws of the State of Mississippi and to pay for the same out of the “Mississippi Transportation Commission Regulation Fund.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7806-08; Laws, 1970, ch. 429, § 8; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 13; Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 77-9-489.
Payment of salaries and expenses from commission’s regulation fund; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

The salaries of all employees authorized to enforce the provisions of the railroad laws, and the reasonable and necessary expenses of such employees, shall be paid out of the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the commission’s regulation fund upon the requisition and warrant in the manner provided by law. An itemized account shall be kept of all receipts and expenditures and reported to the Legislature by the commission.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7806-09; Laws, 1970, ch. 429, § 9; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 14; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-9-491.
Cooperation with other state agencies authorized.

For the purpose of administering and enforcing the provisions of the railroad laws, the public service commission shall have the power, and is directed to cooperate with and use the services of the members of the highway safety patrol and the inspectors employed by the motor vehicle comptroller. However, in utilizing such personnel the commission shall not interfere with or impede the performance of such personnel of the duties and responsibilities otherwise assigned to them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7806-05; Laws, 1970, ch. 429, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1970).

§ 77-9-493.
Tax for regulation of railroads.

All reasonable and necessary operating expenses of the administration of the duties imposed by law upon the Mississippi Transportation Commission, including the salaries of personnel, in its regulation and supervision of railroad companies operating within the State of Mississippi, shall be provided through the levying of the following tax. The amount of said tax is the sum of Two Hundred One Thousand Dollars ($201,000.00) per year. Such tax shall be prorated by the State Tax Commission among the railroad companies which are subject to the tax levied by this section each year, according to the railroad track miles of each of such railroad company operated during the calendar year preceding the assessment. Each railroad company which is subject to the tax levied by this section shall file a statement of such railroad track miles by April 1 of each year showing the railroad track miles operated in the preceding year’s operation. “Railroad track miles” means the miles of road of the railroad system within this state. These statements of railroad track miles shall be filed with the commission and a copy thereof filed with the State Tax Commission. The State Tax Commission shall thereupon calculate the pro rata amount of tax to be paid by each of said railroad companies in order to provide the total amount above stated and shall thereupon submit a statement thereof to the respective railroad companies and the amounts shown due in such statements to the respective railroad companies shall be paid by the respective railroad companies within thirty (30) days thereafter to the State Tax Commission. The State Tax Commission shall pay such funds into the State Treasury on the same day collected to the credit of the Mississippi Transportation Commission.

All administrative provisions of the Mississippi Sales Tax Law, including those which fix damages, penalties and interest for nonpayment of taxes and for noncompliance with the provisions of such chapter, and all other duties and requirements imposed upon taxpayers, shall apply to all persons liable for taxes under the provisions of this chapter, and the Tax Commissioner shall exercise all the power and authority and perform all the duties with respect to taxpayers under this chapter as are provided in the Mississippi Sales Tax Law except where there is a conflict, then the provisions of this chapter shall control.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission and the State Tax Commission are hereby authorized to use all tax returns of any such railroad companies available to them and to make such audits as may be deemed necessary of any and all records of such railroad companies in order to correctly determine the amount of railroad track miles. It shall be the duty of the Department of Finance and Administration to advise the commission of the amount of money on hand from time to time. All expenses of the Mississippi Transportation Commission in its regulation and supervision of railroad companies, including salaries of personnel, shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Finance and Administration. Said warrants shall be issued upon requisition signed by the executive secretary or the chairman and said requisition shall show upon its face the purpose for which the payment is being made, by reference to the purchase order and/or invoice number and objective code. It shall be unlawful for any person to withdraw any money from said fund other than by requisition issued as herein provided. A record of all requisitions issued by the Mississippi Transportation Commission showing to whom, for what purpose, and date issued, shall be placed upon the minute books of the commission and shall become a part of the official record of said commission.

The books and accounts of the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall be audited at the end of each fiscal year, and at any other time deemed necessary, by the State Auditor and a copy of such audits shall be furnished to the Governor and the Mississippi Transportation Commission. The State Auditor may prescribe such further accounting procedure as he deems necessary for the withdrawal of funds by the said commission from said fund. All requisitions drawn in compliance with this section shall be honored by the Department of Finance and Administration and the funds disbursed in accordance therewith. The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall file a report at each regular session of the Legislature showing the expenditure of all funds by the Mississippi Transportation Commission. All proceeds of the above-mentioned tax are hereby allocated to the Mississippi Transportation Commission for the purposes of this section. In the event the funds provided by said tax exceed the amount necessary for the purposes of this section at the end of each year, the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall certify the amount which the said commission estimates will be necessary for the commission for the next year to the State Tax Commission, and the State Tax Commission shall reduce the tax imposed to such amount for the next year and shall collect the proportionate amount thereof as above provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7806-11; Laws, 1970, ch. 428, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 434; Laws, 1979, ch. 443; Laws, 1980, ch. 559, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 478, § 32; Laws, 1987, ch. 343, § 15; Laws, 1992, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 356, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 458, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1998).